District of Columbia statutes.
26-1352

Trust companies to have perpetual succession.

Any company transacting the business of a trust company and heretofore or hereafter organized or operating under the provisions of this chapter, but before April 11, 1986, shall have perpetual succession from the date of its organization, or until such time as it be dissolved, or until its franchise shall become forfeited by reason of violation of law, or until terminated by either a general or special act of Congress, or until its affairs be placed in the hands of a receiver and finally wound up by him.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1289, ch. 854, § 641
June 24, 1936, 49 Stat. 1898, ch. 743
Nov. 23, 1985, D.C. Law 6-63, § 106(a)(1)
as added Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-107, § 2(k), 33 DCR 1168

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-403.
1973 Ed., § 26-303.